North Carolina statutes. Chapter 49A. Rights of Children.
Article 1. Children Conceived by Artificial Insemination.

§ 49A-1.
Status of child born as a result of artificial insemination.

Any child or children born as the result of heterologous artificial insemination shall be considered at law in all respects the same as a naturally conceived legitimate child of the husband and wife requesting and consenting in writing to the use of such technique.

History.

1971, c. 260.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Surrogate Parenthood: Finding a North Carolina Solution,” see 18 N.C. Cent. L.J. 1 (1989).

For article, “For the Sake of the Child: Parental Recognition in the Age of Assisted Reproductive Technology A Framework for North Carolina,” see 43 Campbell L. Rev. 21 (2021).